Missouri, session 2026, HB2730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto fourteen new sections,
to be known as sections 324.2000, 324.2005, 324.2010, 324.2015, 324.2020, 324.2025,
324.2030, 324.2035, 324.2040, 324.2045, 324.2047, 324.2050, 324.2055, and 324.2060, to
read as follows:
324.2000. As used in sections 324.2000 to 324.2060, unless the context requires
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Alter", to change or modify a building or building design, or to revise,
rather than repair, a mitigation system or mitigation system design;
(2) "Board of radon safety" or "board", the group of radon professionals
representing radon business entities as well as nonradon professionals acting on behalf
of the board to establish and implement standards, policies, protocols, and procedures
in accordance with sections 324.2000 to 324.2060;
(3) "Building", any structure used or intended to be used for supporting or
sheltering any use or occupancy;
(4) "Certified", meeting the certification requirements of a radon proficiency
program for radon measurement or radon mitigation that is recognized by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency;
(5) "Compensation", something of value given or received in exchange for radon
measurement, mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2730 2
(6) "Direct supervision", on-site supervision by a certified person who accepts
responsibility for ensuring compliance by his or her employees, subcontractors, or other
designated agents with all applicable requirements under sections 324.2000 to 324.2060;
(7) "Division", the division of professional registration;
(8) "Laboratory analysis", the act of analyzing radon or radon progeny
concentrations with passive measurement devices, the act of calibrating radon or radon
progeny measurement devices, or the act of exposing radon or radon progeny
measurement devices to controlled concentrations of radon or radon progeny;
(9) "Licensee", a person or business entity licensed by the board as a
measurement professional, mitigation professional, radon mitigation inspection
professional, or radon laboratory;
(10) "Measurement", the act of testing the air, water, or soil using an active or
passive measurement device for the presence of radon or radon progeny in the indoor
environment of a building;
(11) "Measurement device", any active or passive device approved by a radon
proficiency program and used for the measurement of radon or radon progeny in air or
water in the indoor environment of a building;
(12) "Measurement professional", a person certified by a radon proficiency
program who provides radon measurement for compensation and who meets the
requirements of section 324.2010;
(13) "Mitigation", the act of installing, repairing, or altering an active or passive
system for the purpose, in whole or in part, of reducing the concentration of radon or
radon progeny in the indoor environment of a building;
(14) "Mitigation professional", a person certified by a radon proficiency
program who provides radon mitigation for compensation and who meets the
requirements of section 324.2015;
(15) "Mitigation system", any active or passive system designed to reduce radon
concentrations in the indoor environment of a building;
(16) "Person", an individual, corporation, association, or other legal entity;
(17) "Prescribed", promulgated by administrative regulation by the board;
(18) "Proficiency program", a national radon credentialing body that is
currently recognized by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(19) "Radon", a naturally occurring radioactive element that is produced by the
breakdown of uranium and exists as a colorless, odorless, and tasteless inert gas;
(20) "Radon laboratory", a business entity approved by a laboratory
accreditation program recognized by the National Environmental Laboratory

HB 2730 3
Accreditation Program that provides laboratory analysis for compensation and meets
the requirements of section 324.2025;
(21) "Radon mitigation inspection professional", a person certified by a radon
proficiency program who provides inspection of radon systems for compensation and
who meets the requirements of section 324.2020;
(22) "Radon progeny", any combination of the radioactive decay products of
radon;
(23) "Research", board-approved scientific investigation that includes radon
measurement, mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis;
(24) "Standard", a current written document developed and continuously
maintained by a standards development organization accredited by the American
National Standards Institute that describes in detail commonly accepted methods for
the performance of certain tasks.
324.2005. 1. No person or business entity shall conduct radon measurement,
mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis in this state after December 31, 2026, for
compensation without the appropriate private certification and state licensing required
under sections 324.2000 to 324.2060. The certification and licensing requirements of
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 shall not apply to any person or business entity before
January 1, 2027.
2. No person or business entity shall advertise or claim to be a radon
measurement professional, radon mitigation professional, radon mitigation inspection
professional, or radon laboratory unless certified and licensed under sections 324.2000
to 324.2060.
3. A radon business entity may engage in radon measurement, mitigation,
inspection, or laboratory analysis if the owner or an employee associated with the radon
business entity is a measurement or mitigation professional, radon mitigation inspection
professional, or radon laboratory, as applicable, and performs or supervises the radon
measurement, mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis work as applicable. Any
business entity that employs these persons shall have a radon business entity license.
4. A measurement or mitigation professional directly in charge of measurement
or mitigation activities within a radon business entity shall notify the board in writing
immediately upon conclusion of the relationship with the radon business entity.
5. A person who owns or rents a single-family home and occupies it may test the
home and install a radon mitigation system if such installation is in accordance with the
applicable standard and the person certifies to the board that the use of a nonlicensed
person will be disclosed upon the sale of the home.

HB 2730 4
6. Any homeowner who receives a radon test kit from the state of Missouri or
any nonprofit health-related organization or who purchases a radon test kit from any
business in this state or online by mail order shall be exempt from the requirements of
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 as long as the test kit is for the homeowner's personal
home only.
7. The board may authorize by regulation subcategories of measurement,
mitigation, and inspection licensure to align with credentials that may be established by
a proficiency program and specify related requirements and limitations.
8. The board may establish reciprocity arrangements with bordering states.
324.2010. 1. The board shall issue a measurement professional license, effective
for a period of two years, to any person certified for measurement who:
(1) Completes an application and pays a fee prescribed by the board by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
2. The board shall renew the measurement professional license, effective for a
period of two years, of any person who:
(1) Completes a licensure renewal process and pays a fee prescribed by the
board by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
3. A measurement professional shall:
(1) Maintain certification by a radon proficiency program;
(2) Ensure measurements are conducted in accordance with the applicable
standard and administrative regulations;
(3) Maintain a quality assurance plan in accordance with the standard for
measurement systems quality assurance;
(4) Ensure measurements are conducted by or under the direct supervision of a
measurement professional;
(5) Use or sell only measurement devices approved by the radon proficiency
program that certifies the person;
(6) Report all measurements as prescribed by the board; and
(7) Ensure all laboratory analysis is conducted by a radon laboratory.
324.2015. 1. The board shall issue a mitigation professional license, effective for
a period of two years, to any person certified for mitigation who:

HB 2730 5
(1) Completes an application process and pays a fee prescribed by the board by
rule;
(2) Presents proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
2. The board shall renew the mitigation professional license, effective for a
period of two years, of any person who:
(1) Completes a license renewal process and pays a fee prescribed by the board
by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
3. A mitigation professional shall:
(1) Maintain certification by a radon proficiency program;
(2) Ensure mitigations are conducted in accordance with the applicable
mitigation standard and administrative regulations;
(3) Maintain a quality management plan in accordance with the applicable
standard for mitigation quality assurance and control;
(4) Ensure all mitigation is conducted by or under the direct supervision of a
mitigation professional;
(5) Report all mitigations as prescribed by the board; and
(6) Ensure all radon mitigation systems repaired or altered after December 31,
2026, meet the applicable mitigation standard.
324.2020. 1. The board shall issue a radon mitigation inspection professional
license, effective for a period of two years, to any person certified for radon mitigation
inspection who:
(1) Completes an application and pays a fee prescribed by the board by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
2. The board shall renew the radon mitigation inspection professional license,
effective for a period of two years, of any person who:
(1) Completes a licensure renewal process and pays a fee prescribed by the
board by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of certification by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.

HB 2730 6
3. A radon mitigation inspection professional shall:
(1) Maintain certification by a radon proficiency program;
(2) Ensure inspections are conducted in accordance with the applicable standard
and administrative regulations; and
(3) Report all inspections as prescribed by the board.
324.2025. 1. The board shall issue a radon laboratory license to any business
entity approved for radon laboratory analysis that:
(1) Completes an application process and pays a fee prescribed by the board by
rule;
(2) Presents proof of independent third-party accreditation; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
2. The board shall renew the radon laboratory license of any business entity
that:
(1) Completes a license renewal process and pays a fee prescribed by the board
by rule;
(2) Presents current proof of approval by a radon proficiency program; and
(3) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that satisfies the
requirements of section 324.2035.
3. A radon laboratory shall:
(1) Maintain proof of accreditation by a laboratory accreditation program
recognized by the National Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program;
(2) Ensure all laboratory analysis is conducted in accordance with the applicable
laboratory analysis standard;
(3) Maintain a quality control program plan in accordance with the applicable
standard for performance criteria for measurement systems; and
(4) Report all laboratory analyses as prescribed by the board.
324.2030. 1. The board shall issue a radon business entity license, effective for a
period of two years, to any business for which the application designates a responsible
person and a licensed radon professional and for which a fee is paid.
2. The radon business entity shall notify the board of the transfer of the radon
business entity license to another business entity within thirty days.
324.2035. 1. Each radon measurement professional, radon mitigation
professional, radon mitigation inspection professional, and radon laboratory shall
maintain an insurance policy in effect at all times during the licensure period that:
(1) Is issued by an insurance company or other legal entity permitted to transact
insurance business in this state;

HB 2730 7
(2) Provides for applicable liability coverage for measurement professionals,
mitigation professionals, radon mitigation inspection professionals, and radon
laboratories in an amount of at least five hundred thousand dollars per occurrence;
(3) Lists the board as a certificate holder of any insurance policy issued under
this section; and
(4) States that cancellation or nonrenewal of the underlying liability insurance
policy is not effective until the board receives written notice of the cancellation or
nonrenewal.
2. A business entity may meet the requirements of this section on behalf of its
employees.
324.2040. 1. Licenses not renewed within thirty days after the renewal date shall
lapse and shall be reinstated only upon the completion of the application process as
prescribed by the board by rule.
2. A licensee shall report any change of information submitted during the
application or renewal process in writing to the board within ten days of such change
taking place. The board shall not be responsible for a licensee not receiving notices,
communications, or other correspondence caused by a failure of the licensee to report
changes.
324.2045. 1. There is hereby established in the division the "Board of Radon
Safety". The board shall:
(1) Promote testing for and mitigation of radon in this state;
(2) Develop and conduct programs for evaluation and control of activities
related to radon, including laboratory analyses, inspection, measurement, and
mitigation;
(3) Issue licenses to eligible certified persons or business entities;
(4) Maintain a public list of all persons or business entities licensed by the board;
(5) Design and administer, or participate in the design and administration of,
educational and research programs to ensure citizens are informed about the health
risks associated with radon;
(6) Enter into agreements with any federal or state agency, political subdivision,
postsecondary education institution, nonprofit organization, or other person or entity to
assist with and administer grants received by the board including, but not limited to, the
Environmental Protection Agency's State and Tribal Indoor Radon Grants (SIRG)
program;
(7) Prepare an annual budget for the use of moneys received by the board from
the collection of fees, receipt of grants, and all other radon-related activities;

HB 2730 8
(8) Collect or receive all fees and other moneys owed under sections 324.2000 to
324.2060 and deposit all those moneys into the radon control fund established in section
324.2047;
(9) Issue subpoenas only through the board's attorney and only under the
authority of the board's general counsel;
(10) Record minutes of board meetings and proceedings, which shall be
documented and made available for public inspection;
(11) Perform other duties and responsibilities relating to the topic of radon;
(12) Promulgate administrative regulations to administer, coordinate, and
enforce sections 324.2000 to 324.2060;
(13) Establish and maintain personnel and information and communication
systems, as necessary, to administer, coordinate, and enforce sections 324.2000 to
324.2060; and
(14) Ensure compliance with sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 and initiate
enforcement action.
2. Each member of the board shall be a citizen, a resident of this state or a
resident of a state adjacent to this state, and a radon measurement professional or radon
mitigation professional, except that licensure as such a professional shall be required
only as described in this section.
3. The board shall consist of seven members as follows:
(1) Four members, who shall include two radon measurement professionals and
two radon mitigation professionals, shall be appointed by the governor from a list of six
names submitted to the governor by the Heartland Chapter of the Indoor Environments
Association;
(2) One member shall be a representative of a public health organization and
shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names submitted to the governor
by the Missouri Cancer Consortium;
(3) One nonvoting member shall be a representative of the home building
industry and shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names submitted to
the governor by the Home Builders Association; and
(4) One nonvoting member shall be a real estate salesperson or broker licensed
under chapter 339 and shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names
submitted to the governor by the Association of Realtors.
4. No business entity shall be represented by more than one professional on the
board.
5. To be eligible for initial appointment as a member of the board under
subsection 2 of this section, a person shall have been actively engaged in the practice of

HB 2730 9
radon measurement, mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis for not less than
three years immediately preceding the date of appointment to the board.
6. Upon expiration of the initial appointments, to be eligible for appointment as a
member of the board under subsection 2 of this section, a person shall have been
actively engaged in performing or managing the practice of radon measurement,
mitigation, inspection, or laboratory analysis for not less than three years in this state
immediately preceding the date of the appointment to the board and:
(1) Hold a valid license as a radon measurement professional or radon
mitigation professional in this state; or
(2) Be associated with a licensed radon laboratory.
7. The governor shall initially appoint two voting members for a term of four
years, two voting members for a term of three years, and one voting member for a term
of two years. All appointments shall expire on June thirtieth of the last year of the
appointee's term. Thereafter, voting members shall be appointed for terms of four
years.
8. No person shall serve more than four consecutive terms. Members shall serve
until their successors are appointed.
9. Upon recommendation of the board, the governor may remove any member of
the board for poor attendance, neglect of duty, misfeasance, or malfeasance in office.
10. Vacancies in the membership of the board for any cause shall be filled by
appointment by the governor for the balance of the unexpired term.
11. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum to do business.
The board shall meet at least once each calendar quarter and at other times deemed
necessary by the chair or a quorum of the board after a minimum of ten days' notice at
a location or teleconference designated by the chair or a quorum of the board.
12. The board shall elect a chair and a vice chair. The chair shall preside at all
meetings at which the chair is present. The vice chair shall preside at all meetings in the
absence of the chair. If the chair and vice chair are absent from a meeting of the board
when a quorum exists, the members who are present may elect a presiding officer to
serve as acting chair until the conclusion of the meeting or until the arrival of the chair
or vice chair.
13. Members of the board shall be immune from suit for any discretionary act
performed in good faith.
14. Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for costs for actual travel and
other actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties
associated with the board, as prescribed by the board by rule.

HB 2730 10
15. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
324.2047. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Radon Control
Fund". All fees authorized to be charged by the board shall be collected by the director
of the division and shall be transmitted to the department of revenue for deposit in the
state treasury for credit to this fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund.
In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in
this fund shall be used solely for the administration and enforcement of sections
324.2000 to 324.2060.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in
this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of general revenue until the
amount in the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds three times the amount of the
appropriation from the fund for the preceding fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the
fund that shall lapse is that amount in the fund that exceeds the appropriate multiple of
the appropriations from the fund for the preceding fiscal year.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
324.2050. 1. The board may refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license
required by sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 for one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The board shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a
complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided in chapter 621.
2. The board may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any license issued under
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered
his or her license for any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country for any offense directly related to the duties and

HB 2730 11
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether a
sentence is imposed;
(2) Fraudulently or deceptively using a license issued under sections 324.2000 to
324.2060;
(3) Use of fraud or deception in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certification,
a license, or a contract to conduct radon measurement, mitigation, inspection, or
laboratory analysis for the applicant or licensee or for another;
(4) Attempting to transfer the authority granted by a license issued under
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 to another person or business entity except as specifically
allowed under section 324.2030;
(5) Use of unfair or deceptive trade practices;
(6) Making any false statement as to a material matter in any application or
other statement or certificate required by sections 324.2000 to 324.2060;
(7) Incompetency, misconduct, or gross negligence in the performance of
providing radon services or assisting in providing radon services;
(8) Revocation of a professional license, certification, registration, or permit
granted by another state following disciplinary proceedings in that state;
(9) Failure to display a license issued under sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 as
prescribed by rule of the board;
(10) Disregarding or violating the standards, building codes, electrical codes, or
related laws of this state or ordinances of any municipality, city, or county;
(11) Failing to adequately train and supervise any person working under the
direction and control of the measurement professional, mitigation professional, radon
mitigation inspection professional, or radon laboratory;
(12) Failing to maintain the liability insurance required under section 324.2035;
(13) Violating any provision of sections 324.2000 to 324.2060, any regulation
promulgated by the board, or any standard, code, rule, or regulation adopted in
accordance with sections 324.2000 to 324.2060; or
(14) Attempting to evade, or aiding or abetting any person attempting to evade,
the provisions of sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 or the administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder by the board.
3. After the filing of a complaint under subsection 2 of this section, the
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon
a finding by the administrative hearing commission that one or more of the grounds for
disciplinary action provided in subsection 2 of this section are met, the board may,
singly or in combination, censure or place the person named in the complaint on

HB 2730 12
probation or suspension or revoke the license of the person on such terms and
conditions as the board deems appropriate.
324.2055. 1. The board or its agent or inspector may examine records of licensed
mitigation professionals, measurement professionals, radon mitigation inspection
professionals, radon business entities, radon laboratories, unlicensed persons, and
unlicensed business entities that perform, offer, or claim to perform activities regulated
by sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 including, but not limited to, conducting inspections of
mitigation system installations and measurement locations in order to ensure that radon
measurement, mitigation, and laboratory analysis are conducted in accordance with the
applicable standard and administrative regulations.
2. For purposes of enforcing sections 324.2000 to 324.2060, the board or its agent
or inspector may inspect or test any equipment used for measurement, mitigation, or
laboratory analysis or photograph or sketch any portion of a site, building, or
equipment involved in measurement, mitigation, or laboratory analysis.
3. In accordance with sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 or any administrative
regulation promulgated by the board pertaining to radon measurement, mitigation, or
laboratory analysis, based on a complaint or report, an agent or inspector of the board
shall have the power to seek to enter upon premises at all reasonable times to make an
inspection and question persons.
4. In accordance with sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 or any administrative
regulation promulgated by the board pertaining to radon measurement, mitigation, or
laboratory analysis, an agent or inspector of the board shall have the power to:
(1) Question licensed mitigation professionals, measurement professionals,
radon mitigation inspection professionals, radon business entities, radon laboratories,
unlicensed persons, and unlicensed business entities that perform, offer, or claim to
perform activities regulated by sections 324.2000 to 324.2060; and
(2) Require the production of radon mitigation system plans, sketches,
diagnostic information, test reports, quality control plans, quality management plans,
and other evidence.
5. Agents and inspectors of the board shall be empowered to issue a stop order to
any owner, agent, or occupant of real property requiring that the radon mitigation
system thereon cease operation if that system has been found to be in violation of
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder
by the board or if the radon mitigation system was not constructed, installed, or altered
in accordance with the applicable standard.
6. A person shall not interfere with an inspection conducted by an agent or
inspector of the board.

HB 2730 13
324.2060. 1. Measurement professionals, mitigation professionals, and radon
mitigation inspection professionals shall report the address, results, and other records
about services performed in a manner prescribed by the board by rule.
2. Records required by sections 324.2000 to 324.2060, administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder, or the applicable standard, including, but not limited to,
records of radon measurement, mitigation, quality control program plans, calibration
certifications, laboratory analysis activities, worker health and safety plans, and
equipment repairs, shall be retained by licensees, as applicable, for a minimum period of
five years or the length of time of any warranty or guarantee, whichever is greater.
3. The board shall make the records available upon request:
(1) To the owner or occupant of a building;
(2) To the board's staff, counsel, and contractors involved in compliance and
enforcement;
(3) To the public aggregated at the census tract or zip code level without
identifying individual homeowners or individual property locations; and
(4) To a state or federal agency that provides aggregated data to the public.
4. Any measurement professional, mitigation professional, or radon mitigation
inspection professional applying for a license or renewal of a license shall specify, for
approval by the board, the physical or electronic location where records required under
sections 324.2000 to 324.2060 shall be maintained for inspection by the board.
✔